Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-1311
Covered online service; covered minor's account; duties.

A covered online service shall:

(1) Provide a prominent, accessible, and responsive tool to allow a covered minor to request that the covered minor's account be unpublished or deleted; and

(2) Honor a request under subdivision (1) of this section no later than fifteen days after the covered online service receives the request.

Laws 2026, LB838, § 34.
July 18, 2026